Idaho statutes. Title 59 PUBLIC OFFICERS IN GENERAL
Chapter 13 PUBLIC EMPLOYEE RETIREMENT SYSTEM
§ 59-1311. Public employee retirement fund created — Administration — Payment of benefits — Perpetual appropriation.

There is hereby established in the state treasury a special fund, the “Public Employee Retirement Fund,” which shall be separate and apart from all public moneys or funds of this state and shall be administered under the direction of the board exclusively for the purposes of this chapter. The state treasurer shall maintain within the fund a clearing account, a portfolio investment expense account and an administration account.

All contributions received from employers by the board on their account and on account of members shall be deposited with a funding agent designated by the board. All such funds are hereby perpetually appropriated to the board and shall not be included in the department’s administration account budget and shall be invested or used to pay for investment-related expenses.

As needed to pay current obligations, the board shall transfer funds from the funding agent to the state treasurer’s office for deposit into the administration account. All funds deposited in the administration account shall be available to the board for the payment of administrative expenses only to the extent so appropriated by the legislature.

As required by the board, the funding agent shall transfer funds to the state treasurer’s office for deposit into the portfolio investment expense account for payment of investment expenses. The funds deposited in the portfolio investment expense account shall be used for payment of investments and investment-related and actuarial-related expenses. Such expenses shall include but not be limited to:

Reporting services;

Investment and actuarial advisory services;

Funding agent fees and money management fees; and

Investment and actuarial staff expenses including hiring of investment and actuarial management personnel. Investment and actuarial management personnel are defined as staff positions that are classified at pay grades N through V by the division of human resources.

As required by the board, the funding agent shall transfer funds to the state treasurer’s office for deposit into the clearing account. All benefits for members shall be payable directly from the clearing account or by the funding agent as they come due. If the amount of such benefits payable at any time exceeds the amount in the clearing account, the payment of all or part of such benefits may be postponed until the clearing account becomes adequate to meet all such payments, or the board may require a refund from the funding agent sufficient to meet all such payments.

Investment and actuarial management personnel shall be exempt from the provisions of chapter 53, title 67, Idaho Code, and section 67-3519, Idaho Code, and shall be hired by and serve at the pleasure of the board. All expenses of the portfolio investment expense account shall be reported on a quarterly basis to the legislature and to the division of financial management in the office of the governor.

Part-time Firefighters.

The Idaho industrial commission’s order, finding part-time firefighters were “paid firefighters” entitled to a cost of living adjustment from the Firemen’s Retirement Fund, was void because, under§ 72-1428, the commission only had jurisdiction to decide specific claims and did not have jurisdiction to decide a petition for declaratory relief, which had to be pursued in a district court. Idaho Retired Firefighters Ass’n v. Public Emple. Ret. Bd., — Idaho —, 443 P.3d 207 (2019).

§ 59-1311A. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 59-1312. Selection of funding agent(s) — Investment of assets — Tax exemption.

The board shall select the funding agent(s) and establish a medium for funding, which may be a self-administration pension trust fund or a group annuity contract, or combination thereof. The contract shall authorize the funding agent(s) to hold and, subject to the provisions of subsections (2) and (3) of this section, to invest moneys for the system and to provide the retirement benefits and death benefits for retired members granted by this chapter.

The board is authorized to select investment managers registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission to invest, reinvest and otherwise manage, subject to the restrictions outlined in subsection (3) of this section, such portions of the assets of the fund as are assigned by the board and are held by a funding agent(s) designated by the board.

The funding agent(s) and investment managers, in acquiring, investing, reinvesting, exchanging, retaining, selling and managing the moneys and properties of the system, shall be governed by the Uniform Prudent Investor Act, chapter 5, title 68, Idaho Code; provided, however, that the board is hereby authorized and empowered, in its sole discretion, to limit, control and designate the types, kinds and amounts of such investments. The funding agent(s) will not be required to segregate moneys applicable to individual employees or employers, but shall only be responsible for the aggregate of such moneys as are received by it.

All contributions paid to the funding agent(s) shall be construed as being exempt from premium taxes payable pursuant to section 41-402, Idaho Code.

§ 59-1313. Trust agreement — Amended to comply with this chapter.

The board may amend its trust agreement with the funding agent to comply with the requirements of this chapter.

§ 59-1314. Rules — Procedures for hearings prior to appeals — Appeals.

Subject to other provisions of this chapter and pursuant to the policy and standards set out in section 59-1301, Idaho Code, the board shall have the power and authority to adopt, amend or rescind such rules and administrative policies as may be necessary for the proper administration of this chapter.

A final decision of the board shall be served by first class and certified mail, postage paid, on all interested parties. Any person aggrieved by any otherwise final decision or inaction of the board must, before he appeals to the courts, file with the executive director of the board by mail or personally, within ninety (90) days after the service date of the final decision on the aggrieved party, a notice for a hearing before the board. The notice of hearing shall set forth the grounds of appeal to the board.

A hearing shall be held before the board in Ada County, Idaho, at a time and place designated by the board or may be undertaken or held by or before any member(s) thereof or any hearing officer appointed by the board for that purpose. The proceedings before the board shall be governed by the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code. Members of the board or the hearing officer shall have power to administer oaths, to preserve and enforce order during such hearings, to issue subpoenas for and to compel the attendance and testimony of witnesses or the production of books, papers, documents and other evidence and to examine witnesses.

Every finding, order or award made by any member or hearing officer pursuant to such hearing, as confirmed or modified by the board, and ordered filed in its office, shall be deemed to be the finding, order or award of the board. The recommended order of the hearing officer shall be considered by the board and the decision and order of the majority of the members shall be the order of the board. Every such order rendered by the board shall be in writing and a copy thereof shall be mailed by first class and certified mail to each party to the appeal and to his attorney of record.

If any person in proceedings herein disobeys or resists any lawful order or process or misbehaves during a hearing, or so near the place thereof as to obstruct the same, or neglects to produce, after having been ordered so to do, any pertinent book, paper, document or other evidence, or refuses to appear after having been subpoenaed, or upon appearing refuses to take the oath as a witness, or after having taken the oath refuses to be examined according to law, the board shall certify the facts to the district court having jurisdiction, and the court shall thereupon, in a summary manner, hear the evidence as to the acts complained of, and, if the evidence so warrants, punish such person in the same manner and to the same extent as for contempt committed before the court, or commit such person upon the same conditions as if doing of the forbidden act had occurred with reference to the proceedings, or in the presence of the court.

Any party aggrieved by a final order of the board may seek judicial review thereof pursuant to the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code. The decision or judgment of the district court shall be subject to appeal to the Supreme Court in the same manner and by the same procedure as appeals are taken and perfected to the court in civil actions at law.

§ 59-1315. Amount, terms and conditions of revised benefits are to be prospective only unless otherwise provided.

As the amount, terms and conditions of benefits may be revised from time to time the application of such revisions shall be prospective only and not retrospective or retroactive unless otherwise provided by statute. Accordingly, unless otherwise provided, a member’s benefits are determined based upon the terms of the plan on the date of the member’s last contribution as an active member.

§ 59-1316. Member’s retirement records confidential.

Each member shall furnish the board with such information as the board shall deem necessary for the proper operation of the system. As provided in section 74-106, Idaho Code, information contained in the retirement system mortgage portfolio loan documents and in each member’s retirement system records is confidential and may not be divulged except as ordered by a court; or except as may be required by the employer member or by the retirement board and its staff in order to carry into effect the purposes of this chapter.

A member may by his written authorization release specific information from his own retirement system records to a stated designee. If the member is deceased, the member’s contingent annuitant or beneficiary may, by written authorization, release specific information from the member’s retirement system records to a stated designee.

The retirement system may disclose the identity of a deceased member’s beneficiary to the member’s spouse, children, and to the court-appointed administrator of the member’s estate.

Should a court order direct distribution or partial distribution of a member’s benefit as defined in either chapter 13, title 59, Idaho Code, or chapter 14, title 72, Idaho Code, to the member’s spouse or former spouse, the system may release to the spouse, former spouse, or the court issuing the order, information pertaining to the division or segregation of the member’s accounts or benefit. This information includes account balances, service accumulations, and related information and histories, but does not include current addresses and phone numbers. The system may release the same information to a member’s current spouse at any time, regardless of whether a court has ordered a distribution or division of the member’s account.

§ 59-1317. Rights to benefits inalienable.

The right of a person to any benefits under this chapter and the money in any fund created by this chapter shall not be assignable or subject to execution, garnishment or attachment or to the operation of any bankruptcy or insolvency law.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the benefits of a member or alternate payee shall be subject to garnishment, execution, or wage withholding under chapter 12, title 7, Idaho Code, for the enforcement of an order for the support of a minor child.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, prior to July 1, 1998, should a court order direct distribution or partial distribution of a member benefit defined in either chapter 13, title 59, Idaho Code, or chapter 14, title 72, Idaho Code, be made to the member’s spouse or former spouse, that member’s full benefit entitlement will be forwarded to the court for distribution.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, on or after July 1, 1998, should a court order direct distribution or partial distribution of a member’s benefit defined in either chapter 13, title 59, Idaho Code, or chapter 14, title 72, Idaho Code, be made to the member’s spouse or former spouse, the court order must be an approved domestic retirement order and shall comply with the requirements of sections 59-1319 and 59-1320, Idaho Code.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, should a court order establish a trust pursuant to section 15-5-409, Idaho Code, the full benefit entitlement will be forwarded to the trustee, naming the trustee as payee.

§ 59-1318. Rights in assets of system limited.

No particular person, group of persons or entity shall have any right in any specific portion of the assets of the system other than such undivided interest in the whole of such assets as is specified in this chapter.

§ 59-1319. Approved domestic retirement orders — Requirements.

An approved domestic retirement order must meet the following requirements:

Clearly specify that such order applies to the retirement system;

Clearly specify the effective date of the order, which is the date of divorce or the date of an earlier property settlement agreement incorporated into the initial divorce decree, the name, account number, date of birth, sex, and last known mailing address of the member and the name, date of birth, sex, and last known mailing address of the alternate payee covered by the order;

Provide for a proportional reduction of the amount awarded to an alternate payee in the event that benefits available to the member are reduced by law;

For benefits as defined in chapter 13, title 59, Idaho Code, for members who are not retired members: (i) clearly specify the amount or percentage of the member’s taxed and tax deferred accumulated contributions which are to be credited to the segregated account or the manner in which such amount or percentage is to be determined, and (ii) clearly specify the member’s months of credited service, either by specific amount or percentage, to be transferred by the retirement system to the segregated account or the manner in which such amount or percentage is to be determined. The months of credited service transferred to the alternate payee shall be proportional to the accumulated contributions attributable to such months of credited service. Months of credited service transferred shall be whole months and not partial months;

For benefits as defined in chapter 13, title 59, Idaho Code, for retired members, clearly specify the amount or percentage of the member’s benefit being paid that the retirement system is to pay to the alternate payee, or the manner in which such amount or percentage is to be determined, and if the alternate payee is the member’s named contingent annuitant and is waiving all survivor benefits as the named contingent annuitant, clearly specify such waiver pursuant to this subsection; and

For benefits as defined in chapter 14, title 72, Idaho Code, clearly specify the amount or percentage of the member’s benefit paid at the time of retirement which the retirement system is to pay to the alternate payee, or the manner in which such percentage is to be determined.

An approved domestic retirement order cannot:

Require the retirement system to provide any type or form of benefit or any option not otherwise provided under the retirement system;

Require the retirement system to provide increased benefits determined on the basis of actuarial value;

Require the payment of benefits to an alternate payee which are required to be paid to another alternate payee under another order previously determined to be an approved domestic retirement order or a court order entered prior to July 1, 1998;

Require any action on the part of the retirement system contrary to its governing statutes or rules other than the direct payment of the benefit awarded to an alternate payee;

Segregate or attempt to segregate the right to reinstate previous credited service as provided in section 59-1360, Idaho Code, unless such credited service has been fully reinstated by full payment of contributions and interest as provided in section 59-1360, Idaho Code;

Purport to award to the alternate payee any future benefit increases that are provided or required by the legislature, except as provided in subsections (6) and (7) of section 59-1320, Idaho Code; or
(g) Require the payment of benefits to an alternate payee before the date on which the alternate payee attains the earliest retirement age under the retirement system. However, an alternate payee may take a lump sum distribution any time prior to receiving a lifetime annuity payment.

In no event shall an approved domestic retirement order cause the retirement system to pay any benefit or any amount of benefit greater than would have been paid had the member’s account not been segregated.

A party to any domestic retirement order issued prior to July 1, 1998, which distributes benefits defined in either chapter 13, title 59, Idaho Code, or chapter 14, title 72, Idaho Code, may move the court to modify such order to comply with the requirements of this section and section 59-1320, Idaho Code, provided that modifications be limited to issues related to the distribution of benefits defined in either chapter 13, title 59, Idaho Code, or chapter 14, title 72, Idaho Code, and that the value of the distribution is not materially changed.

The alternate payee’s social security number shall be provided to the board before a domestic retirement order is approved under section 59-1320, Idaho Code, in a manner prescribed by the board.

§ 59-1319A. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 59-1320. Approved domestic retirement orders — Application and effect.

The executive director of the public employee retirement system or his designee upon receipt of a copy of a domestic retirement order, shall determine whether the order is an approved domestic retirement order and shall notify the member and the alternate payee of the determination within ninety (90) days. Orders shall be applied prospectively only from the first day of the month following the order being determined to be an approved domestic retirement order. The retirement system shall then pay benefits or establish a segregated account in accordance with the order. When established, the segregated account will consist of accumulated contributions identified in the approved domestic retirement order together with accrued interest on that amount from the effective date to the date of segregation.

If the order is determined not to be an approved domestic retirement order, or if no determination is issued within ninety (90) days, the member or the alternate payee named in the order may move the court which issued the order to amend the order so that it will be approved. The court that issued the order or which would otherwise have jurisdiction over the matter has jurisdiction to amend the order so that it will be qualified even though all other matters incident to the action or proceeding have been fully and finally adjudicated.

The executive director of the retirement system to which a domestic retirement order is submitted or his designee has exclusive authority to determine whether a domestic retirement order is an approved domestic retirement order. If it is determined that a domestic retirement order does not meet the requirements for an approved domestic retirement order, both the issuing court and the parties to the order shall be notified so action may be taken to amend the order.

Because an approved domestic retirement order cannot cause the retirement system to pay any benefit or any amount of benefit greater than would have been paid had the member’s account not been segregated, disputes related to benefits paid under an approved domestic retirement order shall be resolved between the parties to the order by the court issuing that order. The retirement system shall not be made a party to the action. Any cost, including attorney’s fees, incurred by the retirement system as a result of such actions shall be distributed by the court among the parties and included in any amended order issued.

Unless the approved domestic retirement order specifies differently, if the member has a right to a vested benefit as of the effective date of the order, then both the member and the alternate payee shall have a right to a vested benefit after the transfer of months of service even if the member or the alternate payee has less than sixty (60) months of membership service.

For benefits under chapter 13, title 59, Idaho Code, for members other than retired members, if the domestic retirement order awards to the alternate payee a portion of the member’s accumulated contributions the alternate payee shall be entitled to all the same benefits and rights an inactive member has under chapter 13, title 59, Idaho Code. The alternate payee’s benefit calculation for a lifetime annuity shall use the member’s average monthly salary and base period as of the effective date of the order and the months of credited service transferred to the alternate payee’s segregated account. The benefit calculation shall use the alternate payee’s age with the appropriate reduction factors based on the alternate payee’s age at the time of payment of the lifetime annuity. For the purpose of the lifetime annuity, the bridging factor, as specified in section 59-1355, Idaho Code, shall be the bridging factor between the effective date of the order or the last day of contributions by the member prior to the effective date of the order, whichever is earliest, and the date of the first lifetime annuity payment to the alternate payee. The alternate payee shall have the right to select any of the optional retirement allowances provided in section 59-1351, Idaho Code. The alternate payee shall have the right to name a beneficiary.

For benefits defined under chapter 13, title 59, Idaho Code, for retired members, and for benefits under chapter 14, title 72, Idaho Code, the retirement system shall include in the alternate payee’s amount or percentage of the benefit, on a proportional basis, all future adjustments, including postretirement increases that are granted by the retirement system, and any death benefit.

For benefits under chapter 13, title 59, Idaho Code, for retired members, the form of payment previously elected by the member under section 59-1351, Idaho Code, cannot be changed by a domestic retirement order, except that a member’s benefit may be adjusted as provided in section 59-1351(2), Idaho Code, if an alternate payee waives all survivor benefits otherwise payable as a contingent annuitant as provided in section 59-1319(1)(e), Idaho Code. Furthermore, no segregated account will be established by the retirement system for the alternate payee. Upon the death of the alternate payee, his/her percentage of the benefit will revert to the person or persons, including the member, who are entitled to the benefit under the system at the time of the alternate payee’s death.

For benefits defined under chapter 14, title 72, Idaho Code, the benefit transferred to the alternate payee shall start when the retirement system begins paying benefits to the member, surviving spouse, or surviving children of the member. The transferred benefit shall be payable only for the lifetime of the alternate payee and it shall not revert to the member, surviving spouse or surviving children of the member.

The retirement system shall be authorized to issue any and all appropriate tax forms or reports for any payments made to the alternate payee.

The retirement system, the retirement board, and officers and employees of the retirement system shall not be liable to any person for making payments of any benefits in accordance with an approved domestic retirement order.

§ 59-1321. Procedure for employees of political subdivisions to be included in retirement system.

A political subdivision not participating in the system may, through its governing body, notify the board in writing that it elects to include its employees in the system. The board shall make a study and estimate the cost of including such employees in the system. Upon completion of the study and under the condition that the excess cost, if any, to include the employees as active members is paid upon admission, the political subdivision may apply for admission to the system. Payment of excess cost shall be made upon admission, unless the board in its sole discretion grants an extension. In no case shall an extension exceed two (2) years. Thereupon the board may upon such terms, not inconsistent with this chapter, as are set forth in a contract between the board and the political subdivision, integrate said political subdivision, and its employees into the system established by this chapter effective on the date of notice of election or later unless otherwise prohibited by law. The contract shall have no effect, however, until notice and hearing regarding it is afforded to such employees. Such contract shall provide for the appropriate funding of accrued benefits under any existing retirement program at the time the political subdivision is admitted to the system.

§ 59-1322. Employer contributions — Amounts — Rates — Amortization.

Each employer shall contribute to the cost of the system. The amount of the employer contributions shall consist of the sum of a percentage of the salaries of members to be known as the “normal cost” and a percentage of such salaries to be known as the “amortization payment.” The rates of such contributions shall be determined by the board on the basis of assets and liabilities as shown by actuarial valuation, and such rates shall become effective no later than January 1 of the second year following the year of the most recent actuarial valuation, and shall remain effective until next determined by the board.

The normal cost rate shall be computed to be sufficient, when applied to the actuarial present value of the future salary of the average new member entering the system, to provide for the payment of all prospective benefits in respect to such member which are not provided by the member’s own contribution.

The amortization rate shall not be less than the minimum amortization rate computed pursuant to subsection (5) of this section, unless a one (1) year grace period has been made effective by the board. During a grace period, the amortization rate shall be no less than the rate in effect during the immediately preceding year. A grace period may not be made effective if more than one (1) other grace period has been effective in the immediately preceding four (4) year period.

Each of the following terms used in this subsection and in subsection (5) of this section shall have the following meanings:

“Valuation” means the most recent actuarial valuation.

“Valuation date” means the date of such valuation.

“Effective date” means the date the rates of contributions based on the valuation become effective pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

“End date” means the date thirty (30) years after the valuation date until July 1, 1993. On and after July 1, 1993, “end date” means twenty-five (25) years after the valuation date.

“Unfunded actuarial liability” means the excess of the actuarial present value of (i) over the sum of the actuarial present values of (ii), (iii), (iv) and (v) as follows, all determined by the valuation as of the valuation date:

all future benefits payable to all members and contingent annuitants;

the assets then held by the funding agent for the payment of benefits under this chapter;

the future normal costs payable in respect of all then active members;

the future contributions payable under sections 59-1331 through 59-1334, Idaho Code, by all current active members;

the future contributions payable to the retirement system under sections 33-107A and 33-107B, Idaho Code.

“Projected salaries” means the sum of the annual salaries of all members in the system.

“Scheduled amortization amount” means the actuarial present value of future contributions payable as amortization payment from the valuation date until the effective date.
(5) The minimum amortization payment rate shall be that percentage, calculated as of the valuation date, of the then actuarial present value of the projected salaries from the effective date to the end date which is equivalent to the excess of the unfunded actuarial liability over the scheduled amortization amount.

§ 59-1323. Transfer of moneys for school personnel. [Repealed.]

§ 59-1324. Transfer of moneys from state community college account.

After July 1, 1984, the state board of education shall, at the request of the board, direct the transfer from the state community college account or from appropriations made for that purpose to the public employee retirement account of an aggregate sum in lieu of and equivalent to individual employer contributions provided by section 59-1322, Idaho Code, required with respect to employees of community college districts on the basis of salaries paid such employees as certified by the board to the state treasurer.

§ 59-1325. Employer remittance to board — Collection of delinquencies.

Each employer, or, where the employer’s payroll is paid separately by departments, each department of the employer, shall remit to the retirement board all contributions required of it and its employees on the basis of salaries paid by it during each pay period together with whatever contributions or contribution credits may be required to correct previous errors or omissions. These remittances shall be accompanied by such reports as are required by the board to determine contributions required and member benefit entitlements established under this chapter and, unless extended in writing by the executive director, shall be remitted no later than five (5) days after each pay date. Such contributions shall be remitted together with contributions remitted pursuant to subsection (5) of section 59-1308, Idaho Code, as directed by the board. Thereafter, unpaid contributions shall be considered delinquent and interest will begin accruing at the greater of the rate of interest provided in section 28-22-104(1), Idaho Code, or regular interest. The executive director may, in his discretion, waive these interest charges in extraordinary circumstances.

If any employer shall fail or refuse to remit any such contributions within thirty (30) days after the date due, the board may certify to the state controller the fact of such failure or refusal and the amount of the delinquent contribution or contributions, together with interest. A copy of such certification and request shall be furnished the delinquent employer.

The state controller shall deduct said amount as an offset, together with interest charges, from any funds payable then or in the future to the delinquent employer and shall pay such amounts to the retirement fund.

§ 59-1325A. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 59-1326. Procedure for complete or partial withdrawal of political subdivisions from the system — Calculation of withdrawal liability — Indemnification.

A political subdivision, through its governing body, may by resolution adopted by two-thirds (2/3) of the members of the governing body, declare its intent to withdraw completely from the system and to submit the question of withdrawing from the system to the active members of the political subdivision. The political subdivision shall notify its employees and the retirement board, in writing, of its action, and shall advise the active members of their right to vote for or against withdrawal, as provided in subsection (2) of this section. A political subdivision shall automatically be considered to have requested a complete withdrawal from the system the date the political subdivision permanently ceases to employ active members. A withdrawing political subdivision shall be required to make withdrawal liability payments as provided in this section.

All active members of the withdrawing political subdivision shall be allowed to vote by secret ballot for or against allowing the political subdivision to completely withdraw from the system. More than fifty percent (50%) of the withdrawing political subdivision’s active members must approve the complete withdrawal at least thirty (30) days before the effective withdrawal date. All active members of the withdrawing political subdivision who are on the political subdivision’s payroll thirty (30) days before the effective withdrawal date shall be allowed to vote. If more than fifty percent (50%) of the withdrawing political subdivision’s active members fail to vote for complete withdrawal, the political subdivision shall not be allowed to withdraw. Fifteen (15) days before the effective withdrawal date the governing board of the withdrawing political subdivision shall certify to the retirement board the results of the voting by the active members.

Partial withdrawal occurs for a political subdivision when its average membership declines from one fiscal year to the next by more than twenty-five (25) members and twenty-five percent (25%) of the average membership in the earlier year. The effective date of partial withdrawal is the first day after the end of the later year.

Complete withdrawal by a political subdivision shall be the first day of the month following the date the political subdivision ceases to employ active members or the first day of the month following sixty (60) days from the date the board receives the political subdivision’s written request to withdraw. However, the complete withdrawal date shall not occur before the withdrawal liability is determined, as provided in subsection (7) of this section.

After complete withdrawal, all employees of the withdrawing political subdivision shall be ineligible to accrue future benefits with the system due to employment with the withdrawing political subdivision. The withdrawing political subdivision shall be ineligible to request to be included in the system, as provided in section 59-1321, Idaho Code, for five (5) years after its complete withdrawal date.
(6) All active or inactive members of the political subdivision shall be eligible for benefits accrued with the system up to the complete withdrawal date. However, no retirement allowance or separation benefit shall be paid until the member actually separates from service with the withdrawing political subdivision, and there is no guarantee of right to re-employment made by the withdrawing political subdivision. If the person returns to employment with the same withdrawing political subdivision within ninety (90) days, any separation benefit or retirement allowance paid to the person shall be repaid to the system.

The excess of the actuarial present value of the vested accrued benefits of the system’s members over the fair value of its assets, both as of the date of the last actuarial valuation adopted by the board prior to the complete withdrawal date based on the assumption that thirty percent (30%) of all terminating employees will eventually return to employment covered by the system and that future cost-of-living allowances as provided in section 59-1355, Idaho Code, will be at a rate of two percent (2%) per year;

The total present value of accrued benefits of all active members of the withdrawing political subdivision as of the last actuarial valuation adopted by the board prior to the complete withdrawal date;

The total present value of accrued benefits of all active members of the system as of the last actuarial valuation adopted by the board prior to the complete withdrawal date.

“Average membership” for a fiscal year shall equal one-twelfth (1/12) of the sum of the number of active members employed during each month of that year.

(7) On the date of complete withdrawal, the withdrawal liability of an employer is (a) multiplied by the ratio of (b) to (c) as follows:

The actuarial costs to determine the amount described in subsection (7) (b) of this section shall be paid by the withdrawing political subdivision.

(8) On the date of partial withdrawal, the withdrawal liability of an employer is the same as if complete withdrawal had occurred, multiplied by one (1) minus the ratio of (a) to (b) as follows:

(a) The average membership of the employer estimated by the board for the year commencing on such date;

(b) The average membership of the employer during the second complete fiscal year prior to such date.

(9) The withdrawing political subdivision shall enter into a contract with the system which establishes terms for the political subdivision’s payment of its withdrawal liability. The contract shall use an interest rate equal to the interest rate used in the actuarial valuation adopted by the board prior to the withdrawal date, net of actuarially assumed investment expenses. The contract shall not extend the duration of the withdrawal liability payments beyond ten (10) years or the end of the current amortization period whichever is less. The contract shall be a financial obligation of the withdrawing political subdivision and any of its successors and assigns. “Current amortization period” means the period over which the amortization payment rate times the actuarial present value of the projected salaries is equivalent to the unfunded actuarial liability, all determined by the current valuation last adopted by the board prior to the complete withdrawal date.

§ 59-1327. Making a false claim — Misdemeanor.

Any person making a false claim for allowance of benefits or payment of money under the provisions of this chapter, knowing the same to be false, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished pursuant to the provisions of section 18-113, Idaho Code.

§ 59-1328. Administrative penalties for failure to comply with reporting requirements.

The board may assess actual costs including staff salaries and benefits and miscellaneous costs such as computer programming and processing, as an administrative penalty against any employer which refuses or fails to comply with the board’s reporting requirements after the system staff has attempted to obtain compliance for a period of three (3) months. After three (3) months, the actual administrative costs shall be monitored and the board may assess them directly against the noncomplying employer unit.

§ 59-1329. Board regulations.

The board is authorized to promulgate rules providing for imposition of interest on delinquent employee contributions.

§ 59-1330. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 59-1331. Contributions.

Beginning on or after the later of the date of establishment or employment, each active member shall contribute toward the cost of the benefits provided under this chapter. This contribution shall be made in the form of a deduction from salary to be transmitted to the board in accordance with section 59-1325, Idaho Code.

Any person who was prevented from being an active member during his first twelve (12) months of employment due to the restriction contained in subsection (2) of section 59-1302, Idaho Code, may, prior to December 31, 1975, pay the board the contributions he would have made absent said restriction and be credited with membership service for such period of time. The time for payment shall be extended provided such payment includes regular interest from December 31, 1975.

Employee contributions received by the board in error may be refunded upon a distributable event with regular interest.